Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.826

Working connections child care program—Standards and guidelines—Duties of the department.

(1) The standards and guidelines described in this section are intended for the guidance of the department. They are not intended to, do not, and may not be relied upon to create a right or benefit, substantive or procedural, enforceable at law by a party in litigation with the state.

(2) When providing services to parents applying for or receiving working connections child care benefits, the department must provide training to departmental employees on professionalism.

(3) When providing services to parents applying for or receiving working connections child care benefits, the department has the following responsibilities:

(a) To return all calls from parents receiving working connections child care benefits within two business days of receiving the call;

(b) To develop a process by which parents receiving working connections child care benefits can submit required forms and information electronically by June 30, 2015;

(c) To notify providers and parents ten days before the loss of working connections child care benefits; and

(d) To provide parents with a document that explains in detail and in easily understood language what services they are eligible for, how they can appeal an adverse decision, and the parents' responsibilities in obtaining and maintaining eligibility for working connections child care.

[ 2018 c 52 s 4; 2013 c 337 s 1. Formerly RCW 43.216.141, 43.215.136.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Finding—2018 c 52: See notes following RCW 43.216.909.